Maryland, session 2026, HB0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–407.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHARTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE
CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(3) “GRANTOR” MEANS A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT OR OTHER
STATE ENTITY THAT PROVIDES STATE AID TO A NONPROFIT ENTITY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0122*

HOUSE BILL 122
(4) “STATE AID” MEANS A CONTRIBUTION, GRANT, OR SUBSIDY
PROVIDED THROUGH THE STATE OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET OR BY THE
ACTION OF A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT FROM STATE FUNDS APPROPRIATED TO
THAT UNIT.
(B) A GRANTOR MAY NOT PROVIDE STATE AID TO A NONPROFIT ENTITY
UNLESS THE NONPROFIT ENTITY:
(1) IS IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE;
(2) IS CURRENT ON ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL TAX
OBLIGATIONS;
(3) HAS A CURRENT CHARTER ON FILE WITH THE STATE
DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION; AND
(4) IF REQUIRED, HAS FILED FOR THE MOST RECENT TAX YEAR:
(I) A FORM 990 WITH THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE; OR
(II) A PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX RETURN WITH THE STATE
DEPARTMENT OF ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.